Oklahoma, session 2025, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma State


Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Alternative base period” means the most recent four (4)


completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of


the individual’s application year and any weeks in which wages were


paid to the individual in the incomplete calendar quarter in which


the individual filed a claim for benefits;


2. “Application year” means the twelve-month period beginning


on the first day of the calendar week in which a covered individual



Req. No. 718 Page 2


files an application for family and medical leave insurance


benefits;


3. “Average weekly wage” means one-thirteenth (1/13) of the


wages paid during the quarter of the covered individual’s base


period or alternative base period in which the total wages were


highest;


4. “Base period” means the first four (4) of the last five (5)


completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of


an individual’s application year; provided, that if the first


quarter of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters was


included in the base period applicable to any individual’s previous


application year, the individual’s base period shall be the last


four (4) completed calendar quarters;


5. “Child” means, regardless of age, a biological, adopted or


foster child, stepchild or legal ward, a child of a domestic


partner, a child to whom the covered individual stands in loco


parentis, or a person to whom the covered individual stood in loco


parentis when the person was a minor;


6. “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor;


7. “Committed relationship” means a relationship in which the


covered individual and the domestic partner of the covered


individual share responsibility for a significant measure of each


other’s common welfare. This includes, but is not limited to, any


relationship between individuals of the same or different sex that

Req. No. 718 Page 3


is granted legal recognition by the state, political subdivision, or


by the District of Columbia as a marriage or analogous relationship


including, but not limited to, a civil union;


8. “Covered individual” means any person who:


a. meets one of the following requirements:


(1) earned an amount determined each year by the


Department of Labor from work in the state during


the person’s base period or alternative base


period prior to submitting an application, or


(2) is self-employed, elects coverage, and meets the


requirements of Section 14 of this act,


b. meets the administrative requirements provided in this


act, and


c. submits an application.


Covered individual shall include former employees who have been


separated from employment for no more than twenty-six (26) weeks at


the start of the individual’s paid family and medical leave and who


satisfy the requirements of this paragraph;


9. “Department” means the Department of Labor;


10. “Domestic partner” means an adult in a committed


relationship with another adult;


11. “Employee” means any person permitted to work by an


employer;



Req. No. 718 Page 4


12. “Employer” means every individual, partnership, firm,


association, corporation, the legal representation of a deceased


individual, or receiver, trustee, or successor of an individual,


firm, partnership, association, or corporation, employing any person


in this state;


13. “Family and medical leave insurance benefits” means the


benefits provided in this act;


14. “Family member” means:


a. a child,


b. a biological, adoptive, or foster parent, stepparent,


or legal guardian of a covered individual or a covered


individual’s spouse or domestic partner, or a person


who stood in loco parentis when the covered individual


or the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner


was a minor child,


c. a person to whom the covered individual is legally


married under the laws of any state or a domestic


partner of a covered individual,


d. a grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether a


biological, foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of


any covered individual or the covered individual’s


spouse or domestic partner, or





Req. No. 718 Page 5


e. any other individual related by blood or whose close


association with the covered individual is the


equivalent of a family relationship;


15. “Health care provider” means any person or other entity who


is licensed pursuant to the provisions of Title 59 or Title 63 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or pursuant to the laws of another state, to


render health care services in the practice of a profession or in


the ordinary course of business;


16. “Interference” means any action that may have the effect of


preventing or discouraging an employee from exercising any right


guaranteed under this act including, but not limited to:


a. failing to comply with the requirements of Section 9


of this act,


b. failing to provide an employee with complete and


accurate information related to an application for


family and medical leave insurance benefits as may be


required from an employer pursuant to Section 15 of


this act,


c. failing to accurately and timely complete and return


an application for family and medical leave insurance


benefits as may be required from an employer pursuant


to Section 15 of this act, and


d. providing the Department with inaccurate or incomplete


information about an employee’s wages or employment as

Req. No. 718 Page 6


it relates to the employee’s eligibility for family


and medical leave insurance benefits;


17. “Paid family and medical leave” means leave taken from


employment, self-employment, or availability for employment in


connection with family and medical leave insurance benefits pursuant


to this act;


18. “Qualifying exigency leave” means leave based on a need


arising out of a covered individual’s family member’s active duty


service or notice of an impending call or order to active duty in


the Armed Forces including, but not limited to:


a. providing for the care or other needs of the military


member’s child or other family member,


b. making financial or legal arrangements for the


military member,


c. attending counseling, military events, or ceremonies,


d. spending time with the military member during a rest


and recuperation leave or following return from


deployment,


e. making arrangements following the death of a military


member,


f. arranging for alternative care for a family member of


the military member when the family member is


incapable of self-care and the active duty or call to


active duty status of the military member necessitates

Req. No. 718 Page 7


a change in the existing care arrangement of the


family member,


g. providing care for a family member of the military


member of an urgent, immediate need basis, but not on


a routine, regular, or everyday basis, when the family


member is incapable of self-care and the need to


provide such care arises from the active duty or call


to active duty status of the military member,


h. admitting to or transferring to a care facility a


family member of the military member when admittance


or transfer is necessitated by the active duty or call


to active duty status of the military member, or


i. attending meetings with staff at a care facility, such


as meetings with hospice or social service providers


for a family member of the military member, when such


meetings are necessary due to circumstances arising


from the active duty or call to active duty status of


the military member but not for routine or regular


meetings;


19. “Retaliatory personnel action” means denial of or


interference with any right guaranteed under this act including, but


not limited to, any threat, discharge, suspension, demotion,


reduction of hours or pay, other adverse action against an employee,


or reporting or threatening to report an employee’s suspected

Req. No. 718 Page 8


citizenship or immigration status or the suspected citizenship or


immigration status of a family member of the employee to a federal,


state, or local law enforcement agency. Retaliatory personnel


action shall also include interference with or punishment for


participating in or assisting an investigation, complaint,


proceeding, or hearing under this act;


20. “Safe leave” means any leave taken because the covered


individual or the covered individual’s family member is the victim


of an act defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Safe leave under this act applies if the covered


individual is using leave to protect the covered individual or the


covered individual’s family member by:


a. seeking a protective order pursuant to Section 60.2 of


Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. seeking medical care, mental health counseling, or


both for the covered individual or the covered


individual’s family member to address physical or


psychological injuries resulting from any act defined


in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. making the covered individual’s or the covered


individual’s family members home secure from the


perpetrator of any act defined in Section 60.1 of


Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,



Req. No. 718 Page 9


d. seeking legal assistance to address issues arising


from any act defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of


the Oklahoma Statutes or attending and preparing for


court-related proceedings arising from such act or


crime,


e. seeking services from a victim services organization,


or


f. taking other steps necessary to protect or restore the


covered individual’s or the covered individual’s


family member’s physical, mental, emotional, and


economic well-being while recovering from an act


defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes; and


21. “Serious health condition” means the same as defined in


Section 101(11) of the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.2 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


On the effective date of this act, a covered individual shall


have the right to take paid family and medical leave and to receive


family and medical leave insurance benefits pursuant to this act if


the individual:


1. Meets the definition of a covered individual as defined in


paragraph 8 of Section 2 of this act; or

Req. No. 718 Page 10


2. Meets one of the following requirements:


a. is caring for a new child because of birth, adoption,


or placement through foster care within twelve (12)


months of the anticipated birth, adoption, or


placement of that child, or has a need to be absent


from work before an actual placement of the child in


order for the placement for adoption or foster care to


proceed,


b. is caring for a family member with a serious health


condition,


c. has a need for leave due to a serious health condition


including, but not limited to, pregnancy or pregnancy


loss,


d. because of any qualifying exigency leave as defined in


paragraph 18 of Section 2 of this act,


e. has a need for safe leave as defined in paragraph 20


of Section 2 of this act, or


f. any reason as set forth in the Family and Medical


Leave Act of 1993.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.3 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The number of weeks for which a covered individual may


take paid family and medical leave under subparagraph c of paragraph

Req. No. 718 Page 11


of Section 3 of this act and for which family and medical leave


insurance benefits are payable under subparagraph c of paragraph 2


of Section 3 of this act in an application year shall be no less


than twelve (12) weeks.


2. The number of weeks for which a covered individual may take


paid family and medical leave under subparagraphs a, b, d, e, or f


of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act and for which family and


medical leave insurance benefits are payable under subparagraphs a,


b, d, e, or f of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act in an


application year shall not exceed twelve (12) weeks.


3. The number of weeks for which a covered individual may take


paid family and medical leave under paragraphs 1 and 2 of this


subsection in aggregate shall not exceed sixteen (16) weeks in an


application year.


B. The first payment of benefits shall be made to an individual


within thirty (30) days after the claim is filed, or within thirty


(30) days after the first day of the approved claim, whichever is


later, and subsequent payments shall be made every two (2) weeks


thereafter. Family and medical leave insurance benefits are payable


as of the commencement of a covered individual’s paid family and


medical leave.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.4 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 718 Page 12


A. The amount of family and medical leave insurance benefits


shall be determined by the Department of Labor.


B. Family and medical leave insurance benefits are not payable


until the covered individual accumulates at least four (4) hours of


family and medical leave.


C. The benefit amount of a covered individual taking paid


family and medical leave from employment shall be based on the


proportion of the covered individual’s typical workweek spent at the


job or jobs from which the covered individual is taking paid family


and medical leave, up to the maximum total benefit established by


the Department. A covered individual with multiple jobs may elect


whether to take leave from one job or multiple jobs.


D. 1. Family and medical leave insurance benefits pursuant to


paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act, except for subparagraph c of


paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act, shall be reduced by the amount


of benefits that a covered individual received under the Employment


Security Act of 1980.


2. During any period of leave pursuant to subparagraph c of


paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act, family and medical leave


insurance benefits shall be reduced by the amount of benefits that a


covered individual receives under Title 85A of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


E. The Commissioner of Labor shall promulgate the rules


necessary to administer the provisions of this section.

Req. No. 718 Page 13


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.5 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Payroll contributions shall be authorized for the exclusive


purpose of financing the payment of benefits under this act and


implementing and administering the provisions of this act.


B. Beginning on the effective date of this act, for each


employee, an employer shall remit to the Family and Medical Leave


Insurance Fund as created in Section 18 of this act in the form and


manner determined by the Department of Labor.


C. Annually, beginning in the fiscal year after the effective


date of this act, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department


shall set the contribution rate for the subsequent fiscal year based


on a percent of employee wages and at the rate necessary to obtain a


total amount of contributions equal to one hundred thirty-five


percent (135%) of the benefits paid during the previous fiscal year


plus an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of


administration of the payment of those benefits during the previous


fiscal year, less the amount of net assets remaining in the fund as


of June 30 of the current fiscal year.


D. A self-employed person who elects coverage under this act


shall remit contribution amount pursuant to this section directly to


the Department.



Req. No. 718 Page 14


E. An employer may deduct a percentage of the contribution


required for an employee by this section, as determined by the


Department, from the employee’s wages and shall remit one hundred


percent (100%) of the contribution required by this section from the


employer and those employees to the Family and Medical Leave


Insurance Fund as created in Section 18 of this act.


F. An employer who fails to or refuses to make contributions as


required in this section shall be assessed a penalty as determined


by the Department for each year the employer so failed to comply in


addition to any amounts previously owed, or fraction thereof, in


addition to the total amount of benefits paid to covered individuals


for whom the employer failed to make contributions. The rate of


assessment imposed by this subsection shall be adjusted each fiscal


year and annually thereafter. Assessments collected pursuant to


this subsection shall be deposited in the Family and Medical Leave


Insurance Fund as created in Section 18 of this act.


G. An employer’s failure to or refusal to remit contributions


to the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund as created in Section


of this act as required in this section shall not affect an


individual’s eligibility for paid family and medical leave and


family and medical leave insurance benefits pursuant to this act.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.6 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 718 Page 15


A. A covered individual shall be entitled to take paid family


and medical leave on an intermittent or reduced leave schedule in


which all of the leave authorized under this act is not taken


sequentially. Family and medical leave insurance benefits for an


intermittent or reduced leave schedule shall be prorated.


B. The covered individual shall make a reasonable effort to


schedule foreseeable paid family and medical leave under this


section so as not to unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.


The covered individual shall provide the employer with prior notice


of the schedule on which the covered individual will be taking the


leave, to the extent practicable. Paid family and medical leave


taken under this section shall not result in a reduction of the


total amount of leave to which a covered individual is entitled


beyond the amount of leave actually taken.


C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle a


covered individual to more leave than required pursuant to Section 4


of this act.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.7 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any covered individual who exercise his or her right under


this act to paid family and medical leave shall, upon the expiration


of that leave, be entitled to be restored by his or her employer to


the position held by the covered individual when the leave

Req. No. 718 Page 16


commenced, or to be restored to an equivalent position with


equivalent seniority, status, employment benefits, pay, and other


terms and conditions of employment including fringe benefits and


service credits that the covered individual was entitled to at the


commencement of leave. A covered individual who exercised his or


her right under this act to paid family and medical leave but does


not receive family and medical leave insurance benefits is still


entitled to the job restoration protection of this section.


B. During any leave pursuant to Section 3 of this act, the


employer shall maintain any health care benefits that the covered


individual had prior to taking such leave for the duration of the


leave as if the covered individual had continued working


continuously from the date the individual commenced the leave until


the date the individual returns from paid family and medical leave;


provided, that the covered individual shall continue to pay the


covered individual’s share of the cost of health benefits and that


the employer shall continue to pay the employer’s share of the cost


of health benefits as required prior to the commencement of leave.


C. This section shall be enforced as provided in Section 21 of


this act.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.8 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 718 Page 17


A. It shall be unlawful for an employer or any other person to


commit interference or restrain or deny the exercise of, or the


attempt to exercise, any right protected under this act.


B. An employer, temporary employment company, employment


agency, employee organization, or other person shall not take


retaliatory personnel action or otherwise discriminate against a


person because that person exercised rights protected under this


act. Such rights include, but are not limited to:


1. The right to request, file for, apply for or use benefits,


or take leave provided for under this act;


2. The right to communicate to the employer or any other person


or entity an intent to file a claim, a complaint with the Department


of Labor or courts, an appeal, that the person has testified or is


about to testify, or has assisted in any investigation, hearing, or


proceeding under this act, at any time, including during the period


in which the person receives family and medical leave insurance


benefits; and


3. The right to inform any person of the person’s rights under


this act.


C. It shall be unlawful for an employer’s absence control


policy to count paid family or medical leave taken under this act as


an absence that may lead to or result in discipline, discharge,


demotion, suspension, or any other adverse action.



Req. No. 718 Page 18


D. Protections of this section shall apply to any person who


mistakenly, but in good faith, alleges a violation of this act.


E. This section shall be enforced through the provisions set


forth in Section 21 of this act.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.9 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. Leave taken with family and medical leave insurance


benefits under this act that also qualifies as leave under the


Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 shall run concurrently with


leave taken under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, as


applicable.


2. An employer may require that family and medical leave


insurance benefits payments made pursuant to this act be made


concurrently or otherwise coordinated with payment made or leave


allowed under the terms of a short-term disability policy, or a


separate bank of time off designated solely for the purpose of


family and medical leave in accordance with this act, under a


collective bargaining agreement or employer policy. The employer


shall give employees written notice of this requirement.


3. Notwithstanding this subsection, an employee shall not be


required to use or exhaust any accrued vacation leave, sick leave,


or other paid time off prior to or while receiving family and


medical leave insurance benefits under this act. A covered

Req. No. 718 Page 19


individual may choose to use any accrued vacation leave, sick leave,


or other paid time off while receiving family or medical leave


insurance benefits under this act, unless the aggregate amount a


covered individual would receive would exceed the covered


individual’s average weekly earnings. Nothing in this subsection


requires an employee to receive or use additional paid time off as


described in this section.


B. 1. This act shall not diminish an employer’s obligation to


comply with any of the following that provide leave or benefits


exceeding the provisions of this act:


a. a collective bargaining agreement,


b. an employer policy,


c. an employment contract, or


d. any applicable local, state, or federal law.


2. An individual’s rights, privileges, or remedies to leave and


benefits under this act may not be diminished by a collective


bargaining agreement entered into, retained, amended, or renewed, or


an employer policy adopted, amended, or retained, after the


effective date of this act.


3. This act shall not diminish an individual’s rights,


privileges, or remedies under a collective bargaining agreement,


employer policy, or employment contract, as applicable.


4. Any agreement by an individual to waive the individual’s


rights under this act is void.

Req. No. 718 Page 20


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.10 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each employer shall provide written notice pursuant to this


section to each employee upon hiring and annually thereafter. An


employer shall also provide written notice to an employee when the


employee requests leave under this act or when the employer acquires


knowledge that an employee’s leave may be for a qualifying reason


under paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act. Such notice shall


include:


1. The employee’s right to family and medical leave insurance


benefits under this act and the terms under which they may be used;


2. The amount of family and medical leave insurance benefits


available;


3. The procedure for filing a claim for benefits;


4. The right to job restoration and benefits continuation under


Section 8 of this act;


5. That discrimination and retaliatory personnel actions


against a person for requesting, applying for, or using family and


medical leave insurance benefits are prohibited under Section 9 of


this act; and


6. That the employee has a right to file a complaint for


violations of this act.



Req. No. 718 Page 21


B. Each employer shall also display and maintain a poster in a


conspicuous place accessible to employees at the employer’s place of


business that contains the information required by this section in a


form approved by the Department of Labor; provided, that in cases


where the employer does not maintain a physical workplace, or an


employee teleworks or performs work through a web-based or app-based


platform, notification shall be sent via electronic communication or


a conspicuous posting on the web-based and app-based platform.


C. All notices required by subsections A and B of this section


shall be provided in English, the language typically used in


communications between the employer and an individual employee, and


any other language that an employer may deem to be a primary


language for a majority of employees at a workplace, provided that


such notice has been provided by the Department. The Commissioner


of Labor may promulgate rules to establish additional requirements


concerning the means by which employers provide such notice.


D. Any employer that violates subsection A, B, or C of this


section shall be assessed a fine not less than One Hundred Dollars


($100.00) and no more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per day


per employee for each violation. Assessments collected pursuant to


this subsection shall be deposited in the Family and Medical Leave


Insurance Fund as created in Section 18 of this act.


E. Employees shall provide notice of their intention to take


leave to their employers under this act; provided, that when the

Req. No. 718 Page 22


need for leave is foreseeable, employees shall not be required to


provide more than ten (10) business days’ notice to their employers.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.11 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Commissioner of Labor shall establish a system for an


aggrieved individual to appeal any determination of his or her claim


for family and medical leave insurance benefits within ninety (90)


days of receiving notice of the determination. In establishing such


system, the Commissioner may utilize any and all procedures and


appeals mechanisms established in Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


provided, that employers shall not be a party to any appeal pursuant


to this subsection.


B. Upon receipt of the Department of Labor’s determination on


appeal, an aggrieved individual may seek judicial review in court.


C. The Commissioner shall implement procedures to ensure


confidentiality of all information related to any claims filed or


appeals taken to the maximum extent permitted by applicable laws.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.12 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A covered individual may be disqualified from family and


medical leave insurance benefits for up to one (1) year if the


individual is determined by the Commissioner of Labor to have

Req. No. 718 Page 23


willfully and knowingly made a false statement or misrepresentation


regarding a material fact, or willfully and knowingly failed to


report a material fact, to obtain benefits under this act. A


covered individual may appeal such determination by the


Commissioner.


B. If family and medical leave insurance benefits are paid


erroneously as a result of willful misrepresentation, or if a claim


for family and medical leave insurance benefits is rejected after


benefits are paid, the Department of Labor may seek repayment of


benefits from the recipient. The Commissioner shall exercise


discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such


payments.


SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.13 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A self-employed person, including an independent contractor,


sole proprietor, partner, or joint venturer, may elect coverage


under this act for an initial period of not less than three (3)


years; provided, that a self-employed person who elects coverage


shall be eligible for family and medical leave insurance benefits


immediately when that person meets the requirements of paragraph 8


of Section 2 of this act, including wages earned from work in


employment and self-employment. The self-employed person shall file


a notice of election in writing with the Commissioner of Labor, as

Req. No. 718 Page 24


required by the Department of Labor. The election becomes effective


on the date of filing the notice. As a condition of election, the


self-employed person shall agree to supply any information


concerning income that the Department deems necessary.


B. A self-employed person who has elected coverage may withdraw


from coverage within thirty (30) days after the end of the three-


year period of coverage, or at such other times as the Commissioner


may prescribe by rule, by filing written notice with the


Commissioner, with such withdrawal to take effect no earlier than


thirty (30) days after filing the notice.


C. A person who has elected coverage under this section shall


be excused from his or her obligations under this section, as the


Department shall promulgate by rule, if:


1. The person is no longer a self-employed person; or


2. The person no longer works in this state.


SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.14 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Labor shall establish and administer


family and medical leave insurance, collect contributions, and pay


family and medical leave insurance benefits as specified in this


act. The provisions of this act shall be administered and


implemented by the Department. The Department shall be the entity


that collects contributions, processes and determines claims for

Req. No. 718 Page 25


family and medical leave insurance benefits, and administers appeals


to the Department pursuant to Section 12 of this act.


B. The Department shall notify the employer within five (5)


business days of a claim being filed pursuant to this act. The


Department is not required to receive any acknowledgement or repose


from the employer before processing the applicant’s claim.


C. The Department may use information-sharing and integration


technology to facilitate the disclosure of relevant information or


records to the extent permitted under state and federal privacy and


confidentiality laws, so long as an individual consents to the


disclosure as required under this law.


D. Information contained in the files and records pertaining to


an individual under this act are confidential and shall not be


disclosed or made open to public inspection, other than to public


employees in the course of official duties, to other agencies as


necessary for administration of this act, or as otherwise required


by law. The individual or an authorized representative of the


individual may review the records or receive specific information


from the records upon presentation of the individual’s signed


authorization.


E. The Commissioner of Labor shall promulgate any rules


necessary to implement the provisions of this act.





Req. No. 718 Page 26


SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.15 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As provided in this section, the Department of Labor shall


establish reasonable procedures and forms for filing claims for


benefits under this act and shall institute forms and procedures


that are not unduly burdensome to an individual claiming benefits.


Such forms, including medical certification forms, shall be


available in English and any other language deemed necessary by the


Commissioner of Labor.


B. An individual may file an application for family and medical


leave insurance benefits no more than sixty (60) days before the


anticipated start date of paid family and medical leave and no more


than ninety (90) days after the start date of paid family and


medical leave. The Department shall waive the ninety-day filing


deadline for good cause. Exact dates of absence are not required


for the Department to process a claim, and claim data may be


adjusted through a claims modification process as established by the


Department.


C. Certification for a covered individual taking leave under


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act shall be


sufficient if the covered individual provides:


1. The child’s birth certificate;



Req. No. 718 Page 27


2. A document stating the child’s birth date issued by the


health care provider of the child or the health care provider of the


person who gave birth;


3. A document issued by the health care provider of the child,


an adoption agency involved in the adoption, or by other


individuals, as determined by the Department, that confirms the


adoption or anticipated adoption and the date of adoption or


anticipated adoption;


4. A document issued by the health care provider of the child,


a foster care agency involved in the placement, or by other


individuals, as determined by the Department, that confirms the


placement or anticipated placement and the date of placement or


anticipated placement; or


5. A voluntary acknowledgement of parentage.


D. Certification for a covered individual taking leave under


subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act shall be


sufficient if it states the date on which the serious health


condition commenced, the probable duration of the condition, the


appropriate medical facts within the knowledge of the health care


provider as required by the Department, a statement that the covered


individual is needed to care for the family member, and an estimate


of the amount of time that the covered individual is needed to care


for the family member.



Req. No. 718 Page 28


E. Certification for a covered individual taking leave under


subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act shall be


sufficient if it states the date on which the serious health


condition commenced, the probable duration of the condition, and the


appropriate medical facts within the knowledge of the health care


provider as required by the Department.


F. Certification for a covered individual taking leaving under


subparagraph d of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act shall be


sufficient if it includes:


1. A copy of the family member’s active-duty orders;


2. Documentation issued by the Armed Forces; or


3. Other documentation permitted by the Department.


G. Certification for a covered individual taking leave under


subparagraph e of paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act shall be


sufficient if the covered individual provides:


1. A police report indicating the covered individual or covered


individual’s family member was a victim of any act defined in


Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. A court document indicating that the covered individual or


covered individual’s family member is involved in legal action


related to any act defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


3. A signed statement from an attorney, member of the clergy,


victim and witness advocate, or a medical professional affirming

Req. No. 718 Page 29


that the covered individual or covered individual’s family member is


a victim of any act defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; or


4. The covered individual’s statement, which need not be


notarized or in any particular form, affirming that the covered


individual or the covered individual’s family member is a victim of


any act defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


H. Notwithstanding subsections C through G of this section, the


Department shall accept alternative certification for any leave


under paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act that demonstrates the


covered individual’s need for leave for a purpose specified in


paragraph 2 of Section 3 of this act.


I. An application for family and medical leave insurance


benefits, including certification pursuant to this section, shall be


submitted electronically, by mail, or by another method specified by


the Department.


J. Any medical, health, or other personal information required


under this section shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed


except with permission from the covered individual who provided it


unless disclosure is otherwise required by law.


K. A health care provider shall provide a certification of a


serious health condition required by this act for paid family or


medical leave, including any required documentation of a serious

Req. No. 718 Page 30


health condition, within seven (7) calendar days of receipt of a


request and authorization from the patient.


1. Nothing in this section requires a provider to complete a


certification for a serious health condition for which the provider


does not have the necessary patient information.


2. If a health care facility requires administrative review of


information or documentation required by this act prior to allowing


a provider to submit the certification of a serious health


condition, then the health care facility shall implement and


maintain policies and practices in conformance with this subsection.


3. A health care provider or health care facility may not


charge a fee for the execution of certification of a serious health


condition under this section. This does not prohibit or limit the


ability of a health care provider to charge a fee associated with


any office visit necessary for evaluating the patient.


SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.16 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. If the Internal Revenue Service determines that family and


medical leave insurance benefits under this act are subject to


federal income tax, the Department of Labor shall inform an


individual filing a new claim for family and medical leave insurance


benefits, at the time of filing such claim, that:



Req. No. 718 Page 31


1. The Internal Revenue Service has determined that benefits


are subject to federal income tax; and


2. Requirements may exist pertaining to estimated tax payments.


B. Family and medical leave insurance benefits pursuant to this


act are not subject to state income tax.


SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.17 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby established as a special fund, separate and


apart from all public monies or funds of this state, the “Family and


Medical Leave Insurance Fund”, which shall be administered by the


Department of Labor exclusively for the purpose of the family and


medical leave insurance benefits established by this act. This fund


shall consist of:


1. All contributions collected pursuant to this act, together


with any interest thereon collected pursuant to this act;


2. All penalties collected pursuant to the provisions of this


act;


3. Interest earned upon any monies in the fund;


4. Any property or securities acquired through the use of


monies belonging to the fund;


5. All earnings of such property or securities; and


6. All other monies received for the fund from any other


source.

Req. No. 718 Page 32


SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.18 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Department


of Labor shall submit a report to the Legislature at the end of each


year that includes:


1. Projected and actual participation under paragraph 2 of


Section 3 of this act;


2. Age, gender, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, primary or


preferred language, residential zip code, average weekly wage,


occupation, and employment type as collected through the initial


application process for all applicants and for applicants with an


approved claim;


3. Average weekly benefit;


4. Average leave duration as a result of paragraph 2 of Section


of this act;


5. Contribution rates;


6. Current and projected fund balances;


7. Processing times for initial claims processing and


determinations;


8. State reasons for claim denials;


9. Number of appeals filed and outcomes related to appeals;


10. Average length of time between application and receipt of


benefits;

Req. No. 718 Page 33


11. A description of the Department’s outreach efforts; and


12. For leaves taken under subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of


Section 3 of this act, category of family member for whom leave was


taken to provide care.


B. Such report shall be made publicly available immediately


following submission to the Legislature.


SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.19 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


After the effective date of this act, and for as long as this


act continues, the Department of Labor shall conduct a public


education campaign to educate workers and employers about the


availability of family and medical leave insurance benefits under


this act, including certification requirements pursuant to Section


of this act. The Department may use funds collected pursuant to


this act in a given year to pay for the public education program.


SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.20 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any individual who believes that his or her rights under


this act have been interfered with, restrained, or denied in


violation of this act or that the individual has been discharged or


otherwise discriminated against in violation of this act may, within


twenty-four (24) months after the violation occurs or the individual

Req. No. 718 Page 34


should reasonably have known that the violation occurred, whichever


is later:


1. File a complaint with the Department of Labor alleging the


violation; or


2. Bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction.


B. The Department shall process complaints filed pursuant to


paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section in the same manner as


complaints filed under Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes are


processed. If the Department finds that an employer has violated


Section 8 or 9 of this act, the Department shall:


1. Order the employer to take action to remedy the violation,


which may include:


a. providing the requested family or medical leave,


b. reinstating an employee,


c. providing for up to two (2) years of back pay,


d. interest on the amount described in subparagraph c of


this paragraph calculated at the prevailing rate,


e. liquidated damages equal to the sum of the amount


described in subparagraph c of this paragraph and the


interest described in subparagraph d of this


paragraph,


f. paying reasonable actual attorney fees to the


complainant, and


g. any other relief the Department deems appropriate; and

Req. No. 718 Page 35


2. Assess the employer a penalty not less than Five Hundred


Dollars ($500.00), with such assessments to be deposited in the


Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund as created in Section 18 of


this act.


C. An individual or the Department may bring a civil action in


a court of competent jurisdiction against an employer for a


violation of Section 8 or 9 of this act. Such action may be brought


by an individual aggrieved by a violation of Section 8 or 9 of this


act without first filing a complaint with the Department. The court


may order payment of damages caused by the violation, liquidated


damages, reasonable costs including attorney fees, and legal and


equitable relief as the court deems appropriate. A civil action


brought after the completion of an administrative proceeding under


subsection B of this section shall be commenced within twenty-four


(24) months after the completion of such proceeding.


SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 950.21 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Department of Labor shall use state data collection,


technology, outreach, and educational efforts to the extent possible


and integrate this act with existing and future state policies,


programs, and practices including, but not limited to, policies,


programs, and practices that serve populations intended to be served


by this act and data that promotes this act’s effectiveness,

Req. No. 718 Page 36


efficiency, and utilization. Nothing in this act should be


interpreted as interfering with such coordination efforts. The


state shall report on these coordination efforts on an annual basis


beginning after the effective date of this act.


SECTION 23. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-718 MR 12/30/2024 10:09:02 PM



































Req. No. 718 Page 37